Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 28 Monuments and Memorials

30-28-1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1949, ch. 2382, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-28-1

; Repealed by P.L. 2016, ch. 350, § 1, effective July 6, 2016; P.L. 2016, ch. 369, § 1, effective July 6, 2016.

30-28-2.
Allocation of building space.

The governor is authorized and empowered to direct and advise the director of the department of administration to make available such space as may reasonably be allocated in the William F. Powers Building, One Capitol Hill, Providence, RI, or any other substantially equivalent space to be provided by the department of administration to the United Veterans’ Council for use as headquarters by the following chartered veterans’ organizations:

The American Legion;

Veterans of Foreign Wars;

Disabled American Veterans;

Military Women Across the Nation Unit 118;

American Veterans (AMVETS);

Jewish War Veterans of Rhode Island;

The Marine Corps League;

The Italian American War Veterans of the United States, Incorporated;

Korean War Veterans;

Vietnam Veterans of America; and

Any other chartered veterans’ organization.

History of Section.

P.L. 1949, ch. 2382, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

30-28-2

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 38, § 1; P.L. 1961, ch. 13, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 141, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 350, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 369, § 2.

30-28-3.
Organizations accommodated in The William F. Powers Building, One Capitol Hill, Providence, RI.

The director of administration shall direct such areas as may be reasonably allocated to the following chartered veterans’ organizations: The American Legion; Veterans of Foreign Wars; Disabled American Veterans; Korean War Veterans; American Veterans (AMVETS); Jewish War Veterans of Rhode Island; The Marine Corps League; Military Women Across the Nation Unit 118; The Italian American War Veterans of the United States, Incorporated.

History of Section.

P.L. 1949, ch. 2382, § 4; P.L. 1951, ch. 2802, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-28-3

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 38, § 2; P.L. 1960, ch. 27, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 350, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 369, § 2.

30-28-4.
Office equipment of veterans’ organizations.

Proper office equipment shall be furnished and supplied for each state department of chartered veterans’ organizations located in the William F. Powers Building, One Capitol Hill, Providence, RI, or any other substantially equivalent space to be provided by the department of administration without cost to the organization.

History of Section.

P.L. 1949, ch. 2382, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

30-28-4

; P.L. 2016, ch. 350, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 369, § 2.

30-28-5.
Maintenance of Perry monument.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate such a sum as it may deem necessary for the purpose of caring for and maintaining the monument erected to the memory of Commodore Oliver H. Perry by this state, situated in the Island cemetery, Newport, and that sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, shall be expended under the direction of the director of environmental management.

History of Section.

Res. 32, 1898; G.L. 1923, ch. 416, § 37; P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 149; G.L. 1938, ch. 632, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2973, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

30-28-5

.

30-28-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1900, ch. 760, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 363, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 416, § 12; P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 149; G.L. 1938, ch. 632, § 4; imp. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

30-28-6

; Repealed by P.L. 1986, ch. 326, § 1, effective June 24, 1986.

30-28-7.
Soldiers’ and sailors’ monument in Providence.

The soldiers’ and sailors’ monument in the city of Providence shall be in the sole custody and charge of the city of Providence, which shall keep the monument in good order and shall at all times provide a suitable location for it.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 27, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 36, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 34, § 5; P.L. 1926, ch. 756, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 656, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-28-7

.

30-28-8.
Local rolls of honor.

All cities and towns are hereby authorized, empowered, and directed to prepare rolls of honor containing the names of persons who are in the service of the United States during the period of any war in which the United States is participating. The town council of each town, and the mayor of each city, shall appoint a committee whose duty it shall be to prepare and post the rolls of honor. The rolls of honor shall be posted in conspicuous places within the limits of the cities and towns, and shall be revised at frequent intervals. This section shall be construed as mandatory and not permissive.

History of Section.

P.L. 1942, ch. 1118, § 1; P.L. 1943, ch. 1287, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-28-8

.

30-28-9.
Despoiling any veterans’ monument or memorial.

Any person or persons who shall mutilate, deface, or otherwise despoil any veterans’ monument and/or memorial shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined no less than five hundred dollars ($500) for each and every offense plus the cost of full restoration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1943, ch. 1118, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

30-28-9

; P.L. 2004, ch. 337, § 1.

30-28-10.
Rhode Island veterans memorial chapel.

The Rhode Island Veterans Memorial Chapel Building Fund, Inc. is hereby authorized to construct a nonsectarian memorial chapel in the Rhode Island veterans cemetery located in Exeter, Rhode Island; provided, however, that the plans for the memorial chapel shall be approved by the director of administration; provided further that the Rhode Island Veterans Memorial Chapel Building Fund, Inc. grant to the state all of its right, title, and interest in the chapel; and provided further that the management and control of the chapel shall be with the director of the department of human services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 52, § 1.

30-28-11.
Monument to veterans of Vietnam, Cambodia, and Laos.

The general assembly shall appropriate a sum of five thousand dollars ($5,000) for the construction of a monument that shall be dedicated to the men and women from this state who served in the armed forces in Vietnam, Cambodia, and Laos. The monument shall be located in the pond at the water place site in the capital center in Providence. The general assembly shall also appropriate such a sum as it may deem necessary for the care and maintenance of the monument, and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer, from time to time, for the payment of the cost of construction and maintenance of the monument upon the receipt by him or her of proper vouchers approved by the adjutant general.

The POW-MIA flag, which is also the official flag of the National League of Families of American Prisoners and Missing in Southeast Asia, shall be flown over the monument until such time as all prisoners and missing in southeast Asia are accounted for.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 481, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 476, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 48.

30-28-12.
State flags provided to veterans’ organizations.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sum that may be necessary out of any money in the treasury not otherwise appropriated for the purpose of providing, without charge, state flags to any state veterans’ organization as enumerated in §

30-28-2

. The state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the sum or so much of it as may be from time to time required, upon receipt by him or her of properly authenticated vouchers.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 190, § 1.